North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-01 State Department of Health

23-01-01.
State department of health — Officers. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health consists of a health council, a state health officer, section chiefs, directors of divisions, and other employees of the department.

Source:

S.L. 1889, ch. 22, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 240; R.C. 1899, § 240; R.C. 1905, § 252; C.L. 1913, § 397; S.L. 1923, ch. 227, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396d1; S.L. 1933, ch. 189, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 23-0101; S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 23-0101; S.L. 1987, ch. 263, § 24; 1993, ch. 218, § 6; 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

Cross-References.

Department as air pollution control agency, see N.D.C.C. ch. 23-25.

Department as radiation control agency, see N.D.C.C. § 23-20.1-02.

Department to designate reportable diseases, see N.D.C.C. § 23-07-01.

Department to enforce regulation of cemeteries, see N.D.C.C. § 23-06-23.

Employees subject to merit system, see N.D.C.C. § 54-44.3-30.

Health maintenance organizations, certification as to fitness for certificate of authority, examinations, see N.D.C.C. ch. 26.1-18.1.

23-01-01.
Health division — Officers.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services’ health division consists of a health council, a state health officer, and other designated employees of the department.

Source:

S.L. 1889, ch. 22, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 240; R.C. 1899, § 240; R.C. 1905, § 252; C.L. 1913, § 397; S.L. 1923, ch. 227, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396d1; S.L. 1933, ch. 189, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 23-0101; S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 23-0101; S.L. 1987, ch. 263, § 24; 1993, ch. 218, § 6; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 101, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-01.1.
State department of health to replace state department of health and consolidated laboratories.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

Wherever the terms “North Dakota state department of health”, “department of health”, “health department”, “state department of health and consolidated laboratories”, “North Dakota state laboratories department”, “state laboratories department”, “state laboratories department director”, or “state laboratories director” appear in this code, the term “state department of health” must be substituted therefor.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 263, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 1; 2017, ch. 67, § 11, effective July 1, 2017.

23-01-01.1.
Department of health and human services to replace state department of health and consolidated laboratories.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The legislative council shall replace, where appropriate, “North Dakota state department of health”, “department of health”, “health department”, “state department of health and consolidated laboratories”, “North Dakota state laboratories department”, “state laboratories department”, “state laboratories department director”, “state laboratories director”, “state department of health”, or any derivatives of those terms, which when used in context indicate an intention to refer to those terms, wherever they appear in this code, and in the North Dakota Administrative Code, with “department of health and human services” or an appropriate derivative of that phrase. The legislative council may replace references to the “state department of health” or any derivatives of that term with “department of health and human services” in any measure enacted by the sixty-seventh legislative assembly.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 263, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 1; 2017, ch. 67, § 11, effective July 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 102, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-01.2.
State department of health designated primary state environmental agency. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 244, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

23-01-02.
Health council — Members, terms of office, vacancies, compensation, officers, meetings.

The health council consists of nine members appointed by the governor including four persons from the health care field, and five persons representing consumer interests. The governor may select members to the council from recommendations submitted by trade, professional, and consumer organizations. On the expiration of the term of any member, the governor, in the manner provided by this section, shall appoint for a term of three years, persons to take the place of members whose terms on the council are about to expire. The officers of the council must be elected annually. Any state agency may serve in an advisory capacity to the health council at the discretion of the council. The council shall meet at least twice each year and at other times as the council or its chairman may direct. The health council shall have as standing committees any committees the council may find necessary. The chairman of the council shall select the members of these committees. The members of the council are entitled to receive compensation at the rate set for a member of the legislative assembly under subsection 1 of section 54-03-20 and their necessary mileage and travel expenses as provided in sections 44-08-04 and 54-06-09 while attending council meetings or in the performance of any special duties as the council may direct. The per diem and expenses must be audited and paid in the manner in which the expenses of state officers are audited and paid. The compensation provided for in this section may not be paid to any member of the council who received salary or other compensation as a regular employee of the state, or any of its political subdivisions, or any institution or industry operated by the state.

Source:

S.L. 1885, ch. 63, §§ 2, 3, 6, 15; 1889, ch. 22, § 1; R.C. 1895, §§ 240 to 242, 244, 252; S.L. 1897, ch. 35, § 1; 1899, ch. 58, § 1; R.C. 1899, §§ 240 to 242, 244, 252; S.L. 1903, ch. 181, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 252 to 254, 256, 258; C.L. 1913, §§ 397 to 399, 401, 403; S.L. 1923, ch. 227, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 396d2; S.L. 1933, ch. 189, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 23-0102; S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 23-0102; S.L. 1959, ch. 218, § 1; 1961, ch. 332, § 8; 1973, ch. 214, § 1; 1977, ch. 218, § 1; 1985, ch. 287, § 1; 1991, ch. 257, § 1; 1991, ch. 592, § 4; 1995, ch. 246, § 2; 1997, ch. 232, § 1; 1997, ch. 432, § 13; 2017, ch. 199, § 12, effective April 29, 2019; 2021, ch. 32, § 8, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Governor’s power to appoint majority of members of council, see N.D.C.C. § 54-07-01.2.

Mileage and travel expenses, see N.D.C.C. § 54-06-09.

23-01-02.1.
Hospital utilization committees — Internal quality assurance review committees — Reports — Immunity. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 234, § 5.

23-01-03.
Powers and duties of the health council.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The health council shall:

Fix, subject to the provisions of section 23-01-02, the time and place of the meetings of the council.

Make rules and regulations for the government of the council and its officers and meetings.

Establish standards, rules, and regulations which are found necessary for the maintenance of public health, including sanitation and disease control.

Provide for the development, establishment, and enforcement of basic standards for hospitals and related medical institutions which render medical and nursing care, and for the construction and maintenance of such institutions, such standards to cover matters pertaining to sanitation, building construction, fire protection measures, nursing procedures, and preservation of medical records. No rule may be adopted with respect to building construction of existing medical hospitals or related medical institutions unless the rule relates to safety factors or the hospital or related medical institution changes the scope of service in such a way that a different license is required from the department pursuant to rules adopted under chapter 23-16.

Hold hearings on all matters brought before it by applicants and licensees of medical hospitals with reference to the denial, suspension, or revocation of licenses and make appropriate determination as specified herein.

The council may direct the state health officer to do or cause to be done any or all of the things which may be required in the proper performance of the various duties placed upon the state department of health.

Source:

S.L. 1885, ch. 63, § 4; R.C. 1895, § 243; S.L. 1899, ch. 30, § 1; R.C. 1899, § 243; R.C. 1905, § 255; C.L. 1913, § 400; S.L. 1923, ch. 227, § 4; 1925 Supp., § 400a; S.L. 1933, ch. 189, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 23-0103; S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 3; 1957 Supp., § 23-0103; S.L. 1989, ch. 298, § 1; 1993, ch. 2, § 9; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1997, ch. 51, § 13.

Cross-References.

Cesspools, septic tanks, and privies, servicing of, see N.D.C.C. § 23-19-06.

Contagious and infectious diseases of livestock, see N.D.C.C. ch. 36-14.

Dairy products, see N.D.C.C. § 23-01-16.

Hairdressers, sanitary rules for, department’s power to approve, see N.D.C.C. § 43-11-11.

Medical peer review records not discoverable or admissible as evidence, see N.D.C.C. § 23-34-03.

Testing and treatment of newborns, see N.D.C.C. ch. 25-17.

Plumbing code, department’s power to approve, see N.D.C.C. § 43-18-09.

23-01-03.
Powers and duties of the health council.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The health council shall:

Fix, subject to the provisions of section 23-01-02, the time and place of the meetings of the council.

Make regulations for the government of the council and its officers and meetings.

Establish standards and regulations, which are found necessary for the maintenance of public health, including sanitation and disease control.

Provide for the development, establishment, and enforcement of basic standards for hospitals and related medical institutions which render medical and nursing care, and for the construction and maintenance of such institutions, such standards to cover matters pertaining to sanitation, building construction, fire protection measures, nursing procedures, and preservation of medical records. No regulation may be adopted with respect to building construction of existing medical hospitals or related medical institutions unless the regulation relates to safety factors or the hospital or related medical institution changes the scope of service in such a way that a different license is required from the department pursuant to rules adopted under chapter 23-16.

Hold hearings on all matters brought before it by applicants and licensees of medical hospitals with reference to the denial, suspension, or revocation of licenses and make appropriate determination as specified herein.

The council may direct the state health officer to do or cause to be done any or all of the things which may be required in the proper performance of the various duties placed upon the department of health and human services.

Source:

S.L. 1885, ch. 63, § 4; R.C. 1895, § 243; S.L. 1899, ch. 30, § 1; R.C. 1899, § 243; R.C. 1905, § 255; C.L. 1913, § 400; S.L. 1923, ch. 227, § 4; 1925 Supp., § 400a; S.L. 1933, ch. 189, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 23-0103; S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 3; 1957 Supp., § 23-0103; S.L. 1989, ch. 298, § 1; 1993, ch. 2, § 9; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1997, ch. 51, § 13; 2021, ch. 352, § 103, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-03.1.
Newborn metabolic and genetic disease screening tests.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The health council shall adopt rules relating to the storage, maintenance, and disposal of blood spots or other newborn screening specimens.

The health council shall specify a panel of metabolic diseases and genetic diseases for which newborn screening must be performed. The screening panel must include disorders and diseases selected by the state health officer with input from an advisory committee that is approved by the health council.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 245, § 1; 2011, ch. 210, § 1; 2015, ch. 204, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

23-01-03.1.
Newborn metabolic and genetic disease screening tests.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall adopt rules relating to the storage, maintenance, and disposal of blood spots or other newborn screening specimens.

The health council shall specify a panel of metabolic diseases and genetic diseases for which newborn screening must be performed. The screening panel must include disorders and diseases selected by the state health officer with input from an advisory committee that is approved by the health council.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 245, § 1; 2011, ch. 210, § 1; 2015, ch. 204, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 104, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-03.2.
Duties of the health council. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 246, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 184, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

23-01-03.3.
Long-term care nursing scholarship and loan repayment grant program.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state health council, in cooperation with the North Dakota long term care association, shall administer the long-term care nursing scholarship and loan repayment grant program. The purpose of the program is to provide matching funds to nursing facilities for the facilities to use in recruiting and retaining nurses by providing scholarships to nursing facility staff and other individuals to obtain a nursing education and by assisting in the repayment of student loans for licensed nurses employed in a nursing facility. The state health council shall adopt rules necessary to administer the program, including rules establishing criteria regarding eligibility for and distribution of program grants.

An applicant for a program grant shall establish that the applicant:

Is a licensed nursing facility;

Has available matching funds equal to the amount of the grant request; and

Meets the eligibility criteria established by rule.

An eligible applicant may receive a program grant not exceeding five thousand five hundred dollars in the first year of the biennium. Any funds appropriated by the legislative assembly for the grant program which are remaining after the first year of the biennium may be distributed to eligible applicants in the second year of the biennium in any amount determined by the state health council.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 431, § 8.

23-01-03.3.
Long-term care nursing scholarship and loan repayment grant program.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The state health council, in cooperation with the North Dakota long term care association, shall administer the long-term care nursing scholarship and loan repayment grant program. The purpose of the program is to provide matching funds to nursing facilities for the facilities to use in recruiting and retaining nurses by providing scholarships to nursing facility staff and other individuals to obtain a nursing education and by assisting in the repayment of student loans for licensed nurses employed in a nursing facility. The department of health and human services shall adopt rules necessary to administer the program, including rules establishing criteria regarding eligibility for and distribution of program grants.

An applicant for a program grant shall establish that the applicant:

Is a licensed nursing facility;

Has available matching funds equal to the amount of the grant request; and

Meets the eligibility criteria established by rule.

An eligible applicant may receive a program grant not exceeding five thousand five hundred dollars in the first year of the biennium. Any funds appropriated by the legislative assembly for the grant program which are remaining after the first year of the biennium may be distributed to eligible applicants in the second year of the biennium in any amount determined by the state health council.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 431, § 8; 2021, ch. 352, § 105, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-04.
Effect of rules and regulations.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

All rules and regulations promulgated by the health council under the powers granted by any provisions of this title are binding upon all county and municipal health officers, and upon all county, municipal, and private medical hospitals and upon related institutions, and have the force and effect of law.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 237, § 5; 1925 Supp., § 2971b5; R.C. 1943, § 23-0104; S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 4; 1957 Supp., § 23-0104.

Collateral References.

Constitutional rights of owner as against destruction of building by public authorities, 14 A.L.R.2d 73.

Physical examinations or tests, health regulations requiring submission to, as violation of constitutional rights, 25 A.L.R.2d 1407, 1409.

Air pollution control: validity of legislation permitting administrative agency to fix permissible standards of pollutant emission, 48 A.L.R.3d 326.

Power of court or other public agency to order medical treatment for child over parental objections not based on religious grounds, 97 A.L.R.3d 421.

Power of court or other public agency to order medical treatment over parental religious objections for child whose life is not immediately endangered, 21 A.L.R.5th 248.

23-01-04.
Effect of rules and regulations.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

All rules and regulations adopted by the department of health and human services under the powers granted by any provisions of this title are binding upon all county and municipal health officers, and upon all county, municipal, and private medical hospitals and upon related institutions, and have the force and effect of law.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 237, § 5; 1925 Supp., § 2971b5; R.C. 1943, § 23-0104; S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 4; 1957 Supp., § 23-0104; 2021, ch. 352, § 106, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-04.1.
Rulemaking authority and procedure. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 299, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

23-01-04.2.
Legislative intent — Health vaccination charges.

It is the intent of the legislative assembly that the state department of health adopt rules defining appropriate administration charges for vaccine provided by the department to physicians, private clinics, and hospitals.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 35, § 3; 1991, ch. 258, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

23-01-04.3.
Alternative health care services pilot project — Application — Notice — Hearing — Approval — Duration.

At any time that the health care needs of a city, township, or other geographic area are not being adequately met, any person may apply to the state health council for approval to conduct an alternative health care services pilot project. The application must address the need for and benefits of the pilot project. It must also contain a detailed description of the nature and scope of the project, quality control, organization, accountability, responsibility, and financial feasibility.

Upon receipt of an application under subsection 1, the state health council shall schedule a public hearing, send notice to all interested parties, and give public notice of the hearing by publication in the official newspaper of each county in the pilot project area. At the hearing, the council shall accept written and oral testimony. The council shall review the application and all testimony presented at the hearing and approve, disapprove, or modify and approve the application based on criteria established by the council. The criteria must address the availability and use of health personnel, facilities, and services.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, upon approval of an application submitted under subsection 1, the state health council, in consultation with the state health officer and any other public or private entity consulted by the state health council, shall set the standards for the delivery of health care services by the pilot project. The standards may not adversely affect the state’s participation in federal Medicare and Medicaid programs. No more than three separate projects may be operational at any time and no project may be operational for longer than five years.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 259, §§ 1 to 3.

23-01-05.
Health officer — Qualifications, salary, term, duties. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The governor shall appoint the state health officer who at the time of appointment must be a physician with substantive private or public administrative experience and public health experience. The state health officer is entitled to receive a salary commensurate with that individual’s training and experience. The governor shall set the salary of the state health officer within the limits of legislative appropriations to the department. The state health officer is entitled to receive all necessary traveling expenses incurred in the performance of official business. The state health officer may not engage in any other occupation or business that may conflict with the statutory duties of the state health officer and holds office for a term of four years. The state health officer is the administrative officer of the state department of health. When the office of the state health officer is temporarily filled, the governor shall appoint at least three licensed physicians recommended by the state medical association to serve as an advisory committee to the state health officer. Each member of the advisory committee is entitled to receive reimbursement of expenses in performing official duties in amounts provided by law for other state officers. The term of the advisory committee coincides with the term of the state health officer. A committee member serves at the pleasure of the governor. The duties of the state health officer are as follows:

Enforce all rules and regulations as promulgated by the health council.

Hold public health unit boards of health responsible for enforcement of state rules, serve in an advisory capacity to public health unit boards of health, and provide for coordination of health activities.

Establish and enforce minimum standards of performance of the work of the local department of health.

Study health problems and plan for their solution as may be necessary.

Collect, tabulate, and publish vital statistics for each important political or health administrative unit of the state and for the state as a whole.

Promote the development of local health services and recommend the allocation of health funds to local jurisdictions subject to the approval of the health council.

Collect and distribute health education material.

Maintain a central public health laboratory and where necessary, branch laboratories for the standard function of diagnostic, sanitary and chemical examinations, and production and procurement of therapeutic and biological preparations for the prevention of disease and their distribution for public health purposes.

Establish a service for medical hospitals and related institutions to include licensing of such institutions according to the standards promulgated by the health council and consultation service to communities planning the construction of new hospitals and related institutions.

Comply with the state merit system policies of personnel administration.

Establish a program to provide information to the surviving family of a child whose cause of death is suspected to have been the sudden infant death syndrome.

Issue a written order relating to a disease control measure necessary to prevent the spread of a communicable disease. A disease control measure may include a special immunization activity and decontamination measure.

The state health officer shall limit a written order issued under this section to the geographical area affected by the communicable disease. The state health officer may not issue a statewide order under this section unless the governor has declared a statewide disaster or emergency under chapter 37-17.1 and the governor consents to the order. The statewide order is limited in duration to the duration of the declared disaster or emergency unless terminated earlier pursuant to chapter 37-17.1.

A written order issued under this section has the same effect as a physician’s standing medical order.

The state health officer shall apply to the district court in a judicial district in which a communicable disease is present for an injunction canceling a public event or closing a place of business. On application of the state health officer showing the necessity of the cancellation, the court may issue an ex parte preliminary injunction, pending a full hearing.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an order issued pursuant to this subsection may not:

Substantially burden a person’s exercise of religion unless the order is in furtherance of a compelling governmental interest and is the least restrictive means of furthering that compelling governmental interest;

Treat religious conduct more restrictively than any secular conduct of reasonably comparable risk, unless the government demonstrates through clear and convincing scientific evidence that a particular religious activity poses an extraordinary health risk; or

Treat religious conduct more restrictively than comparable secular conduct because of alleged economic need or benefit.

A person claiming to be aggrieved by a violation of subdivision a may assert that violation as a claim or defense in a judicial proceeding and obtain appropriate relief, including costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

Make bacteriological examination of bodily secretions and excretions and of waters and foods.

Make preparations and examinations of pathological tissues submitted by the state health officer, by any county superintendent of public health, or by any physician who has been regularly licensed to practice in this state.

Make all required analyses and preparations, and furnish the results thereof, as expeditiously and promptly as possible.

Cause sanitary statistics to be collected and tabulated, and cause to be ascertained by research work such methods as will lead to the improvement of the sanitation of the various parts of the state.

From time to time, cause to be issued bulletins and reports setting forth the results of the sanitary and pathological work done in the laboratories embodying all useful and important information resulting from the work carried on in the laboratories during the year, the substance of such bulletins and reports to be incorporated in the annual report of the state health officer.

Establish by rule a schedule of reasonable fees that may be charged for laboratory analysis. No charge may be made for any analysis conducted in connection with any public health incident affecting an entire region, community, or neighborhood.

Establish a review process for instances in which the department is requested to conduct an epidemiological assessment of a commercial building. The epidemiological assessment must include:

A statement of whether there are known environmental causes;

If there are known environmental causes identified, a recommendation of how they can be remediated or mitigated; and

If there are no known environmental causes identified, a statement that no known causes exist.

Costs for remediation, mitigation, and consultant services are the responsibility of the building owner. Proof of remediation of any identified environmental concern related to the epidemiological assessment is the burden of the building owner.

Source:

S.L. 1885, ch. 63, §§ 2, 3, 6, 15; 1889, ch. 22, § 1; R.C. 1895, §§ 240 to 242, 244, 252; S.L. 1897, ch. 35, § 1; 1899, ch. 58, § 1; R.C. 1899, §§ 240 to 242, 244, 252; S.L. 1903, ch. 181, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 252 to 254, 256, 258; C.L. 1913, §§ 397 to 399, 401, 403; S.L. 1923, ch. 227, § 3; 1925 Supp., § 396d3; S.L. 1933, ch. 189, § 1; 1943, ch. 207, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 23-0105; S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 5; 1957 Supp., § 23-0105; S.L. 1977, ch. 104, § 5; 1987, ch. 290, § 1; 1993, ch. 218, § 7; 1993, ch. 247, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1999, ch. 242, § 1; 2001, ch. 29, § 11; 2005, ch. 32, § 13; 2013, ch. 203, § 1; 2021, ch. 92, § 3, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 190, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 191, § 1, effective April 22, 2021; 2021, ch. 192, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 23-01-05 was amended 5 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 3 of Chapter 92, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1410; Section 1 of Chapter 191, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1118; Section 1 of Chapter 190, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1418; Section 107 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247; and Section 1 of Chapter 192, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2181.

Cross-References.

Air pollution control advisory council, member of, see N.D.C.C. § 23-25-02.

Cancer cures, enforcement of provisions prohibiting treatment by other than licensed physician, see N.D.C.C. § 23-23-03.

Interstate compact on mentally disordered offenders, duty to administer, see N.D.C.C. § 25-14-02.

Little Missouri River commission, member of, see N.D.C.C. § 61-29-04.

Mileage and travel expenses, see N.D.C.C. § 54-06-09.

Nursing home administrators’ board, member of, see N.D.C.C. § 43-34-02.

Powers and duties as to sexually transmitted diseases, see N.D.C.C. § 23-07-07.

Tuberculosis treatment duties, see N.D.C.C. § 23-07.1-04.

Vital statistics personnel, appointment of, see N.D.C.C. § 23-02.1-03.

23-01-05.
Health officer — Qualifications, salary, term, duties. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The governor shall appoint the state health officer who at the time of appointment must be a physician with substantive private or public administrative experience and public health experience. The state health officer is entitled to receive a salary commensurate with that individual’s training and experience. The governor shall set the salary of the state health officer within the limits of legislative appropriations to the department. The state health officer is entitled to receive all necessary traveling expenses incurred in the performance of official business. The state health officer may not engage in any other occupation or business that may conflict with the statutory duties of the state health officer and holds office for a term of four years. If the office of the state health officer is filled temporarily, the governor shall appoint at least three licensed physicians recommended by the state medical association to serve as an advisory committee to the state health officer. Each member of the advisory committee is entitled to receive reimbursement of expenses in performing official duties in amounts provided by law for other state officers. The term of the advisory committee coincides with the term of the state health officer. A committee member serves at the pleasure of the governor. The duties of the state health officer are as follows:

Enforce all regulations as promulgated by the health council and all rules adopted by the department of health and human services.

Hold public health unit boards of health responsible for enforcement of state rules, serve in an advisory capacity to public health unit boards of health, and provide for coordination of health activities.

Establish and enforce minimum standards of performance of the work of the local department of health.

Study health problems and plan for their solution as may be necessary.

Collect, tabulate, and publish vital statistics for each important political or health administrative unit of the state and for the state as a whole.

Promote the development of local health services and recommend the allocation of health funds to local jurisdictions subject to the approval of the health council.

Collect and distribute health education material.

Maintain a central public health laboratory and where necessary, branch laboratories for the standard function of diagnostic, sanitary and chemical examinations, and production and procurement of therapeutic and biological preparations for the prevention of disease and their distribution for public health purposes.

Establish a service for medical hospitals and related institutions to include licensing of such institutions according to the standards promulgated by the health council and consultation service to communities planning the construction of new hospitals and related institutions.

Establish a program to provide information to the surviving family of a child whose cause of death is suspected to have been the sudden infant death syndrome.

Issue a written order relating to a disease control measure necessary to prevent the spread of a communicable disease. A disease control measure may include a special immunization activity and decontamination measure.

The state health officer shall limit a written order issued under this section to the geographical area affected by the communicable disease. The state health officer may not issue a statewide order under this section unless the governor has declared a statewide disaster or emergency under chapter 37-17.1 and the governor consents to the order. The statewide order is limited in duration to the duration of the declared disaster or emergency unless terminated earlier pursuant to chapter 37-17.1.

A written order issued under this section has the same effect as a physician’s standing medical order.

The state health officer shall apply to the district court in a judicial district in which a communicable disease is present for an injunction canceling a public event or closing a place of business. On application of the state health officer showing the necessity of the cancellation, the court may issue an ex parte preliminary injunction, pending a full hearing.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an order issued pursuant to this subsection may not:

Substantially burden a person’s exercise of religion unless the order is in furtherance of a compelling governmental interest and is the least restrictive means of furthering that compelling governmental interest;

Treat religious conduct more restrictively than any secular conduct of reasonably comparable risk, unless the government demonstrates through clear and convincing scientific evidence that a particular religious activity poses an extraordinary health risk; or

Treat religious conduct more restrictively than comparable secular conduct because of alleged economic need or benefit.

A person claiming to be aggrieved by a violation of subdivision a may assert that violation as a claim or defense in a judicial proceeding and obtain appropriate relief, including costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

Make bacteriological examination of bodily secretions and excretions and of waters and foods.

Make preparations and examinations of pathological tissues submitted by the state health officer, by any county superintendent of public health, or by any physician who has been regularly licensed to practice in this state.

Make all required analyses and preparations, and furnish the results thereof, as expeditiously and promptly as possible.

Cause sanitary statistics to be collected and tabulated, and cause to be ascertained by research work such methods as will lead to the improvement of the sanitation of the various parts of the state.

From time to time, cause to be issued bulletins and reports setting forth the results of the sanitary and pathological work done in the laboratories embodying all useful and important information resulting from the work carried on in the laboratories during the year, the substance of such bulletins and reports to be incorporated in the annual report of the state health officer.

Establish by rule a schedule of reasonable fees that may be charged for laboratory analysis. No charge may be made for any analysis conducted in connection with any public health incident affecting an entire region, community, or neighborhood.

Establish a review process for instances in which the department is requested to conduct an epidemiological assessment of a commercial building. The epidemiological assessment must include:

A statement of whether there are known environmental causes;

If there are known environmental causes identified, a recommendation of how they can be remediated or mitigated; and

If there are no known environmental causes identified, a statement that no known causes exist.

Costs for remediation, mitigation, and consultant services are the responsibility of the building owner. Proof of remediation of any identified environmental concern related to the epidemiological assessment is the burden of the building owner.

Source:

S.L. 1885, ch. 63, §§ 2, 3, 6, 15; 1889, ch. 22, § 1; R.C. 1895, §§ 240 to 242, 244, 252; S.L. 1897, ch. 35, § 1; 1899, ch. 58, § 1; R.C. 1899, §§ 240 to 242, 244, 252; S.L. 1903, ch. 181, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 252 to 254, 256, 258; C.L. 1913, §§ 397 to 399, 401, 403; S.L. 1923, ch. 227, § 3; 1925 Supp., § 396d3; S.L. 1933, ch. 189, § 1; 1943, ch. 207, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 23-0105; S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 5; 1957 Supp., § 23-0105; S.L. 1977, ch. 104, § 5; 1987, ch. 290, § 1; 1993, ch. 218, § 7; 1993, ch. 247, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1999, ch. 242, § 1; 2001, ch. 29, § 11; 2005, ch. 32, § 13; 2013, ch. 203, § 1; 2021, ch. 92, § 3, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 190, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 191, § 1, effective April 22, 2021; 2021, ch. 192, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 107, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-05.1.
Organ or tissue transplant assistance administration — Standing appropriation.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state health officer shall select a private nonprofit patient-oriented organization incorporated in this state for the purpose of administering financial assistance to organ or tissue transplant patients who are residents of this state. The state health officer shall adopt rules governing administration of this section. The organization selected shall administer and provide grants from available funds to alleviate demonstrated financial needs of transplant patients for any costs associated with transplant operations, under guidelines based on current social service eligibility requirements. There is hereby created as a special fund in the state treasury an organ transplant support fund, the principal and income of which is hereby appropriated to the organization selected under this section. The organization administering the fund may solicit contributions from private or governmental sources and such contributions may be deposited in the fund.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 260, § 1.

Collateral References.

Physician’s use of patient’s tissues, cells, or bodily substances for medical research or economic purposes, 16 A.L.R.5th 143.

23-01-05.1.
Organ or tissue transplant assistance administration — Standing appropriation.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The executive director of the department of health and human services shall select a private nonprofit patient-oriented organization incorporated in this state for the purpose of administering financial assistance to organ or tissue transplant patients who are residents of this state. The department of health and human services shall adopt rules governing administration of this section. The organization selected shall administer and provide grants from available funds to alleviate demonstrated financial needs of transplant patients for any costs associated with transplant operations, under guidelines based on current social service eligibility requirements. There is hereby created as a special fund in the state treasury an organ transplant support fund, the principal and income of which is hereby appropriated to the organization selected under this section. The organization administering the fund may solicit contributions from private or governmental sources and such contributions may be deposited in the fund.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 260, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 108, effective September 1, 2022.